Title
Review for Air Force One (1997)
Number of Reviews
34

Author
Walter Frith
     If you watch Wolfgang Petersen's 1993 film 'In the Line of Fire'
starring Clint Eastwood as a veteran Secret Service agent you will see in the
closing credits that the film crew actually had support from the authentic
United States Secret Service in making that film.  I want to say from the
start that Wolfgang Petersen's latest film 'Air Force One' is a decent one
and while it isn't a let down, it certainly wasn't as good as some of the
advance reviews I read and the hype that was built up around it.
     Having said that, 'Air Force One' looks to be in contradiction with 'In
the Line of Fire' in the sense that the breakdown of security is a suspicious
one in dealing with the preservation and safety of the world's most powerful
man, the President of the United States.  Certainly it is possible for the
President of any country to fall victim to the violent actions of one or many
predators but you won't believe the ease with which the President's life is
put in danger in this film.
     Harrison Ford plays the President with integrity and credibility and his
plane, Air Force One, is hijacked by a Russian terrorist squad whose leader
(Gary Oldman) is a vengeful squirt who blames the U.S. for the decaying moral
fibre in the now capitalist Russia as well as what he feels are many of the
other unjust situations around the world.  The President's staff and his
family are in constant danger as well and the entire situation is monitored
back at the White House by the Vice President (Glenn Close) and a staff of
military brass, bureaucrats and other observers.  
     I wanted to see Harrison Ford battle the terrorists with his brain
rather than with his muscle (and a few automatic weapons to be sure) and the
cliches the film shows are somewhat tiresome and not very exciting.  Some how
when you see a film like this you know the outcome before the first half hour
is up and 'Air Force One' overall lacks freshness in its presentation.  
     With all that in mind, it is a decent way to spend two hours in a movie
theatre as long as your expectations aren't too high and I can't think of too
many other actors in their mid 50's (Ford is 55) that could pull off the role
of a President with the physical prowess that Ford has since his character is
also a combat veteran and medal of honor winner.  Everyone else in the cast
is good and you'll probably like 'Air Force One' better when it's been over
for five minutes in comparison to thinking about it an hour later.

Author
Jeff Shooman
First Impressions:  Everything in this film is riveting, from the action to
the actors.  Wolfgang Petersen's ability to make the obvious suspenseful and
his use of the element of surprise are huge pluses.  Harrison Ford delivers
probably one of his best performances, if not his best performance, ever.  A
remarkable film. 
The plot in AIR FORCE ONE is very simple:  A group of Russian psychopaths
hijack the President's plane in the effort to secure the release of one Gen.
Alexander Radek whose release could spawn the death of hundreds of thousands.
 If they United States doesn't comply, Oldman will shoot a hostage every half
hour.  
There is a lot of code and honor involved in this simplistic plot.  At one
point, Glenn Close's Vice President and all of the cabinet members know that
the President is alive, but the question remained whether or not he was
legally capable of leading the nation.  Under a technicality, it all comes
down to whether or not the Vice President will decide to override an order of
the President.  This scene is very enjoyable and it will make a lot of people
think.
Moving on from plot, I've heard that some people think that Wolfgang
Petersen's action scenes were sloppy and cheesy and very fake-looking.  If
this is true, which I doubt it is anyway, I plead ignorance:  I thought Mr.
Petersen's action scenes, while maybe not up to the standards of such
technological extravaganzas such as FACE/OFF or even INDEPENDENCE DAY, he
made everything in this film suspenseful and he had me guessing until the
end.  
Harrison Ford's President is a true family man.  He is also a man capable of
firing weapons (Uzis) and beating up people, as he was a Medal of Honor
winner in Vietnam.  He is the ideal President, even shying away from the text
of a speech to the dismay of his advisors.  Mr. Ford gives this performance
more than it needed.  He added honor, he added glory, he played it to
perfection.  I often think Mr. Ford is weak in some of the characters he's
played, such as in PRESUMED INNOCENT or even THE FUGITIVE.  His presence just
didn't leave me with memories like strong performances of DeNiro and Pacino
have done.  He was a good actor, but not a strong and powerful actor.  Now,
my opinion chances.  The audience feels a bit empty (at least I did) when Mr.
Ford is not on screen for when he is on screen, you get this feeling that
everything is going to be right.  And even knowing that, Petersen still kept
me guessing until the end.  
This, my friends, was a great movie.  Again, as in a lot of movies I've seen
this summer, a very micrscopic complaint was that I thought the movie lagged
for about 10-15 minutes at the end.  But hey, we can't all be perfect.

Author
Hanson Yoo
Gosh, it feels like I've seen this movie before – and there's a very good
reason.  Air Force One is yet another "Die Hard on a…" movie – but to be fair,
it turns out better than the others because it sticks closer to the original Die
Hard formula than the others.  Does this sound familiar?  A team of terrorists
takes over, one lone unidentified man strikes back at them one by one while his
wife is held captive, and someone dies because the hero won't reveal his
identity to them.  Yes, there are some other wrinkles thrown in for good
measure, but it's basically the old same old with a glossy new paint job.  Yet
it's difficult to say the movie will fail to please because the formula is so
robust.
Harrison Ford is the President of the United States and Gary Oldman is the
terrorist, and they duke it out on the Presidential plane.  That's really all
you need to know, since the supporting characters are props for the plot, which
is straight from Die Hard.  For those who haven't seen Die Hard, rent it.  It's
a superior film.     
The biggest problem with Air Force One is its lack of any real originality – you
know what's going to happen because the plot never deviates from its
predecessors.  Without this element of suspense, the movie just doesn't deliver
real thrills.  One good thing the movie has going for it is some semblance of
restraint – in any other movie of it's ilk, the one-liners would have been
flying.  When Ford hits the first terrorist with a chair, you can almost hear
him say, "Have a seat."  But he doesn't.  However, the temptation is apparently
too great – he eventually tells Gary Oldman to, "Get off my plane," during their
final fight on the plane's rear exit with the kind of teeth gritted earnestness
that is Harrison Ford's forte.  I can forgive them this one transgression, I
suppose.
There are also elements that just don't work.  Oldman's ultra-nationalistic
terrorist philosophy falls flat.  Preach on brother, but do it in a different
movie.  It's given lip service without any substance, with only one line having
any real impact (he explains that Americans tolerated the killing of thousands
of Iraqis just to, "save a nickel on a gallon of gasoline."  Great line).  But
all in all the political angle is just a coat of varnish – it makes everything
shinier, but it's ultimately transparent.  
Another problematic element is the first daughter – there's simply no reason for
her to be held captive other than to have a child in peril and to mimic the
structure of the real First Family.  I find the prior distasteful.  Ford's
character cares enough about his wife to need a daughter in peril as well.  
Even the things that should work aren't executed well.  The charm of Die Hard
was watching Willis scheme and plan.  He takes notes; he pieces things together.
But Ford simply hides, punches out people, takes their weapons, hides again, and
then shoots them.  There seemed to be no real intelligence applied to his
character.   
And finally, the biggest gaffe is the motive of the Secret Service Agent that
betrays the President.  Why was that of all things left on the cutting room
floor?  The plot is really hollow without it.  
The only saving grace in the movie is Ford's character – he's eminently
Presidential, and the way the good guys to a one sacrifice their lives without
hesitation to save his illustrate how important the President of the United
States really is.  It's a refreshing view of the office that has been lost in
the movies (compare with the previously released Murder at 1600, Nixon, and
Absolute Power), and lost in real life.    
I wish I could have enjoyed Air Force One as much as many others did and many
other will, but I found it too derivative to be anything more than a trifle.

Author
James Brundage
Air Force One (1997, R)
Directed by Wolfgang Peterson (In the Line of Fire)
Written by Andrew W. Marlowe (End of Days)
Starring: Harrison Ford (Star Wars), Gary Oldman (The Professional), William
H. Macy (Pleasantville), Glenn Close (Fatal Attraction), Wendy Crewson (To
Gillian on her 37th Birthday)
Let's say one thing first. Anyone who was expecting to find a really good
movie inside of something that combines Wolfgang Peterson, the director of
"In the Line of Fire" with Harrison Ford of the Star Wars Trilogy and Gary
Oldman, who played the slack-jawed sociopath in the worst movie of the
summer, "The Fifth Element", couldn't be good. Granted, "In the Line of
Fire" was one of the best assassin stories told since "Seven Days in May"
and the Star Wars Trilogy is at least a fun bunch, but the
two-out-of-three-ain't-bad rule just doesn't apply to movies.
In fact, in this movie, what you'd expect is almost reversed.
Gary Oldman is the only one who shows anything worth watching on the screen
while Peterson's copycat style and Ford's Rambo with wrinkles simply don't
work.
Air Force One is supposed to be a story about the hijacking of the
president's plane, but is really simply the hijacking of about five other
plane movies in disguise.
Having somebody go into the machinery and cause mischief? Sound like
"Executive Decision"? Having people being pulled from one plane to another
by a wire? The robbery sequence in "Cliffhanger". Having a kills quick and
never dies superman on the plane? An obvious shoot off of Passenger 57. And
having a demented sociopath in control of a flight? "Turbulence" or "Con
Air", take your pick.
For me this was one of those movies in which I was wondering why I saw it in
the first place as I came out of the theater. That and it was one of the
movies in which you know exactly what is going to happen makes those two
hours ones in which I wish life had a return policy on it.

Author
Michael Redman
America has finally gotten what it's needed for years: a compassionate sincere
President with impressive ethics and charisma. Regretfully it's only a movie.
President James Marshall (Harrison Ford) is fed up with terrorist activities.
Teaming up with the Russian government, he orders a strike force capture of
Alexander Radek, a reactionary general ready to re-unite the Soviet Union
under his fascist reign. During a celebration dinner, Marshall announces to
the world that he will send troops to fight oppression wherever it exists.
"It's your turn to be afraid," he declares.
Returning home on Air Force One, he gets the chance to demonstrate his words
personally. Ultra-nationalist militants loyal to Radek and lead by Ivan
Korshunov (Gary Oldman) hijack the plane threatening to kill a hostage every
half hour until the general is released. Marshall has a chance to escape in a
jettisoned capsule (which Clinton says doesn't exist in real life) but
refuses, preferring to stay and fight.
Director Wolfgang Peterson ("Das Boot", "In The Line Of Fire", "Outbreak"
takes the over-used "Die Hard" theme and gives us something new in a film that
combines brilliant acting with hold-your-breath intensity. If you can take
your eyes off the screen, steal a look at the audience. Everyone is totally engrossed.
The two actors do what they do best and they are probably the best there are
at it.
Oldman has become typecast as a psychotic sadist and no wonder -- he does it
so well. When he engages the teenage first daughter in sensitive conversation
about his family and the next minute threatens to blow a hole in her forehead,
you know that he's over the edge in the manner that people with A Cause can
become. You are convinced that young Alice could end up terminated at any
time. When Korshonov executes passengers, there is a frightening reality to
it. The guns in this film are deadly weapons, not cartoons.
Harrison Ford has done one role for several years. His mastery of the man in
the suit propelled into desperate action is in top form here. Marshall is a
Medal Of Honor recipient who now has a desk job. Realistically, he's a man
afraid, but not afraid to act. Ford is one of the few actors that could make
us believe that the President of the United States could be an action hero.
Indiana Jones in the Oval Office. He and Oldman's archetypes match up perfectly.
The other roles also go to accomplished actors. Glenn Close as the determined
but unsure Vice-President is the picture of an executive forced into a
position that she's not quite ready for. Dean Stockwell as Defense Secretary
eager for the authority ("I'm in charge here!") is her political nemesis and
turns in a good Alexander Haig performance.
Of course the politics are all wrong.  A cowboy President (even down to his
name) with big guns shoots his way through problems. Much like the American
collective memory of JFK's Camelot, the image is wondrous if you don't look
too deep. The pulls on the patriotic heartstrings would be too much in any
other film, but they work here. No matter what political spin you put on the
story, the movie is an outstanding one. 
        I left the theater feeling that there is hope for the country's future: not a
common belief nowadays. Now if we only can get Ford to run for President. Just
because one actor didn't work out as Chief Executive doesn't mean that a
different one couldn't.
(Michael Redman has lost count of how many years he's been writing this column
-- 21 years...22 years -- while watching the sunflowers outside his window
swaying in the cool breezes.)
[This appeared in the 7/31/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Author
Marty Mapes
**1/2 (out of 4) A Los Angeles office building. A group of violent
terrorists. One man stands in their way - a tough New York cop. Die
Hard! 
A military vessel. A group of violent terrorists. One man stands in
their way - a former Navy SEAL. Under Siege! 
A presidential airborne fortress. A group of violent terrorists. One man
stands in their way - The President of the United States of America(?).
Air Force One! 
This formula has gone too far. A cop, okay. A Navy SEAL, alright. A
president, don't be silly. 
Because I was expecting IN THE LINE OF FIRE II, I was surprised and
insulted by the premise. The president as an action hero? What nonsense!
A president who's been through the political meat grinder with his
youthful idealism intact? Don't make me gag! 
You should know that this movie is an action movie, not a thriller. It
is closer to CON AIR than it is to IN THE LINE OF FIRE. The plot and the
details are cartoonish, not psychological. Now, with that in mind, AIR
FORCE ONE is pretty good. But it is not subtle or intellectual. 
Part of why I expected a smart thriller is because the director is
Wolfgang Petersen, director of DAS BOOT, a claustrophobic look at life
aboard a WWI German U-boat, and of IN THE LINE OF FIRE, an exciting
cat-and-mouse thriller. Petersen's latest, OUTBREAK, was a lot closer to
an action movie than a thriller, and it looks like he has finally fully
crossed over now with AIR FORCE ONE. 
There is a surprising similarity between AIR FORCE ONE and many of
Petersen's previous films. One of the first people we see is Jürgen
Prochnow, who played the Captain in DAS BOOT. Both settings (this movie
and DAS BOOT) are tight, closed, and finite. The airplane's defenses are
highlighted and even look similar to those of the U-boat. And like the
climactic scene in IN THE LINE OF FIRE, an F-14 puts itself between AFO
and a Russian missile, like some valiant winged secret service agent. 
If Petersen really is migrating away from thrillers, he's not a bad
action director. In fact, there are a few very tense sequences in AFO
that really stand out. An early attempt at landing AFO incorporates
tension from the ground rescue crew, the pilot, the terrorists, and the
President's cabinet. There is also an awesome non-stunt involving a
lifeline between two aircraft. 
There is a spark of an idea in this movie that could have proved
interesting, had it been played up - Ford's president is a lot like
Oldman's terrorist. In the opening scene, President Marshall delivers an
anti-terrorism speech. He vows to use whatever force is necessary to
defend what he knows is morally right. It is this absolute moral
certainty that makes him no better than Ivan Korshunov. Korshunov says
"you have just handed my country over to gangsters and prostitutes;" he
is as morally certain and rightfully indignant as Marshall. In
Marshall's stated moral landscape, this is all the justification
Korshunov needs to commit violent acts. Marshall is the victim of one
who shares his own morality. How beautifully ironic the situation, and
how disappointing that Petersen didn't do more with it. 
Further, when the terrorist's demands have been met, Korshunov does not
keep his end of the bargain; he doesn't release the hostages. Okay, he's
the bad guy. That's expected. But when the "Good guys" finally get the
upper hand, they behave no better, gunning down a man who has just been
freed from prison. 
Petersen didn't really explore this hypocrisy, but at least he left it
open by giving the terrorist some understandable motives and some
legitimate gripes. Still, the idea is obscured, if not lost, through the
haze of testosterone morality and action movie justice. 
Because I was expecting more, I was a little disappointed by AFO. On the
other hand, Petersen is a good action director, and if you keep that in
mind, you'll probably enjoy this movie.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
George McAdams
                              AIR FORCE ONE
                     A film review by George McAdams
                      Copyright 1997 George McAdams
Return to your (movie) seats!  Fasten your seatbelts and restore your
seat backs to their full upright position because the summer's best
action/drama movie is here, and its title is "Air Force One." Harrison
Ford stars in this must-see movie as James Marshall, the President of
the United States whose "The United States doesn't negotiate with
terrorists" philosophy is challenged when Air Force One is hijacked
while in route from Moscow to the U.S. Ford, playing the president in a
manner that probably has President Clinton dreaming with a smile on his
face, has the situation further complicated when his wife and daughter
are part of the hostages.
Yes, you can put behind you painful memories of "Batman and Robin," and
you can just forget all the other weak plots devices of other
presidential dramas, such as "Murder at 1600" because Harrison Ford
gives the best performance as a president since Ronald Reagan's.
And while other performers fill the screen, none rises to the top like
Air Force One the plane. In the proud tradition of
mechanical devices having greater fortitude over man, the plane shows
that it can take a licking a keep on ticking, right to the
very end. Gary Oldman neither disappoints or overplays the part as the
lead hijacker sympathetic to a splinter-group of Russians who want to
reverse the results of an open market economy: gangsters, prostitutes,
and poverty.
One cannot help but feel that Director Wolfgang Peterson has pulled
together his memories of two other previous directorial
efforts, "Das Boot" and "In the Line of Fire," to give the viewers a
movie that flies through two hours of turbulence with such a rush that
viewers will want to take a return flight.
One interesting note about the film was the interesting way that two
dramatic situations were handled. In the first, President
Marshall has faxed to the White House Conference Room instructions to
have Air Force One reduce its speed and lower its
altitude while refueling. As the viewers watch the faxed document rest
at the White House unbeknownst to everyone around it, the hostages
prepare to parachute from Air Force One, hoping that the message will
have gotten through. On one hand, this
gives the appearance that the producers wanted to cut some time from the
movie; however, thinking about this some more, I
find that I liked it because its about time a movie doesn't show me
everything. In a second sequence near the end of the movie,
the release of a militant general is imminent and viewers are left
wondering if his release will be stopped.
"Air Force One" gets three and one-half stars out of four from me. I'd
recommend it to others and wouldn't hesitate to see it
again.
Air Force One's web site is at
http://www.spe.sony.com/Pictures/SonyMovies/movies/AFO/

Author
Scott Renshaw
AIR FORCE ONE
(Columbia)
Starring:  Harrison Ford, Gary Oldman, Glenn Close, Wendy Crewson, Liesel
Matthews, Paul Guilfoyle, Xander Berkeley, Dean Stockwell.
Screenplay:  Andrew W. Marlowe.
Producers:  Wolfgang Petersen, Gail Katz, Armyan Bernstein and Jon
Shestack.
Director:  Wolfgang Petersen.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity)
Running Time:  118 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     "Harrison Ford is the President of the United States" trumpet the
print ads for AIR FORCE ONE, to which the only appropriate response is:
well, of _course_ he is.  The phenomenally popular presidency of Ronald
Reagan, if nothing else, gave us a solid sense of what the American people
really want in a Chief Executive.  They want a cross between John Wayne
and Bill Cosby, someone who can be both America's Sheriff and America's
Father Figure.  In short, they want an approachable ass-kicker.
     If that phrase doesn't describe Harrison Ford among all A-list
Hollywood stars, I don't know whom it does describe.  Ford's James
Marshall, the President imperilled in AIR FORCE ONE when terrorists hijack
the First Plane, is the President every American secretly dreams about --
a resolute leader and devoted family man who also happens to be handy with
an Uzi.  Not only would we follow him into battle (and make no mistake, he
_would_ be leading the charge), we'd play a game of touch football with
him on the lawn afterwards.
     That kind of man isn't just the perfect President -- he's also the
perfect action hero.  AIR FORCE ONE is an extraordinarily effective
thriller by any standard, but it's even better with Ford on board.
Wolfgang Petersen's direction combines the claustrophobia of DAS BOOT with
the cat-and-mouse dynamic of IN THE LINE OF FIRE, then throws in a few
stomach-churning dogfights and mid-air escape attempts just for seasoning.
There hasn't been a more assured piece of technical film-making in
theaters this year, nor a more riveting action spectacle.  Ford, however,
moves AIR FORCE ONE from the realm of the mere thrill ride to something
more potent.  He gives you the sense that something is at stake:  honor,
family, the life of a real human being in danger who is also the President
of the United States.
     It is the "honor" part of that equation which may raise a few hackles
over the rah-rah patriot games of AIR FORCE ONE.  There is a decidedly
retro-80s feel to the Communist zealots led by Gary Oldman, to the TOP
GUN-style military hot-doggery, to Ford's Rambo-in-pinstripes solo
guerrilla campaign to free hostages.  Still, Andrew W. Marlowe's script
never feels jingo all the way.  Oldman's performance gives weight to lines
which might sound like token imperialist-bashing in someone else's mouth
(one such line finds him quieting a righteous hostage by screaming "You
killed 100,000 Iraqis so you could save a nickel a gallon on gas...don't
lecture me on the articles of war").  In fact, every performer takes
chances which make AIR FORCE ONE more than a simple crowd-pleaser.  The
gutsiest choices may be those made by Glenn Close, playing Vice-President
Kathryn Bennett.  In a more pandering film, Bennett would have been the
take-charge woman in a room full of ineffectual men.  Instead, Close plays
her as smart but uncertain, dedicated to her President perhaps against all
reason.
     Not that anyone could blame her.  Part of what makes AIR FORCE ONE so
satisfying -- and, at times, so wryly amusing -- is that it places
President Marshall squarely in the real world of 1990s American political 
consciousness.  The unswerving devotion, the candlelight vigils and the
tremendous popularity all make perfect sense as the reactions of cynics in
the presence of true greatness.  It's easy to get caught up in the thrills
of AIR FORCE ONE, not just because it is so well-constructed, but because
we're watching a national fantasy.  There's only one thing missing from
the finale of AIR FORCE ONE:  Harrison Ford should step onto the tarmac at
Dulles, tip his hat to the assembled throng, sweep the First Lady up onto 
his trusty horse, and ride into the sunset.

Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: Harrison Ford, Gary Oldman, Glenn Close, Wendy Crewson, 
      Liesel Matthews, Paul Guilfoyle, Xander Berkeley, William H. Macy, 
      Dean Stockwell, Jurgen Prochnow
Directors: Wolfgang Petersen
Producers: Gail Katz and Wolfgang Petersen, Armyan Bernstein and 
      Jonathan Shestack
Screenplay: Andrew W. Marlowe
Cinematography: Michael Ballhaus
Music: Jerry Goldsmith
U.S. Distributor: Columbia Pictures
     AIR FORCE ONE is DAS BOOT director Wolfgang Petersen's third major 
Hollywood movie to feature a top American star.  (For the record, the 
previous two are IN THE LINE OF FIRE and OUTBREAK.)  One consistent 
aspect of Petersen's studio pictures is that he hasn't had any 
difficulty getting A-list talent (Clint Eastwood, Dustin Hoffman, 
Harrison Ford) to work for him, and there is a reason for this.  After 
watching AIR FORCE ONE, I am convinced that Petersen is one of the best 
action/thriller directors working today.  The thing that astonishes me 
the most is how much he can cull from so little.  Petersen has taken a 
script that can best be described as idiotically preposterous and, from 
this thin and lame-brained skeleton, has generated a moderately-
entertaining motion picture.  In the hands of a hack, AIR FORCE ONE 
could have turned into a major embarrassment.  As it is, the movie is a 
roller coaster ride for those who prefer not to think once the theater 
lights have dimmed.
     Even the most energetic and original action film is likely to 
foster a sense of deja vu.  It's the nature of the genre -- after all, 
there are only so many ways you can blow things up and stage shoot-outs.  
So it shouldn't come as a surprise that about 95% of AIR FORCE ONE seems 
familiar -- the film is a clear derivative of DIE HARD and EXECUTIVE 
DECISION.  The twist here is that the action hero isn't a down-on-his-
luck cop or an anti-terrorist PhD, he's the President of the United 
States.  And, although the script seems to have been written with Steven 
Segal in mind, somehow the film makers snagged Harrison Ford.  How?  
Well, I can think of two possible reasons.  First, a big paycheck can 
make almost any role look appealing.  Second, most American actors 
probably crave the opportunity to play the President (look at Ronald 
Reagan...).
     So how does Ford fare as the latest big-screen Commander-in-Chief?  
Better than the likes of Bill Pullman (INDEPENDENCE DAY), Ronny Cox 
(MURDER AT 1600), and Sam Waterston (THE SHADOW CONSPIRACY), but not up 
to the level of Michael Douglas (THE AMERICAN PRESIDENT) or Gene Hackman 
(ABSOLUTE POWER).  Ford's James Marshall is suitably charismatic and 
decisive, but he's too good to be true.  He has a code of ethics and, 
when he says stomach-churningly saccharine things like "Never again will 
I allow political self-interest to deter us from doing what is morally 
right," he actually means it.  Ford may be a good actor, but not even he 
can make us swallow a fantasy character like this.  
     The storyline is generic.  A military partnership between the 
United States and Russia has resulted in the capture of the dangerous 
and fanatical General Alexander Radek (Jurgen Prochnow, the captain from 
DAS BOOT), the self-appointed military dictator of Khazakstan.  A group 
of terrorists, led by the psychotic Ivan Korshunov (Gary Oldman), uses 
an elaborate ruse to get on board Air Force One for a trans-Atlantic 
trip from Moscow to Washington D.C.  Once the plane is in the sky, 
Korshunov (with a little inside help) takes over.  The President 
apparently escapes in an emergency pod, but, in reality, he's hiding out 
in the luggage compartment, ready to do battle single-handedly with the 
six bad guys, who are holding fifty passengers at gun point, including 
his wife (Wendy Crewson) and 12-year old daughter (Liesel Matthews).  
Back in the United States, the Vice President (Glenn Close) is doing her 
best to defuse the situation, but Korshunov is adamant:  he will kill 
one hostage every half-hour until Radek has been released.
     There are numerous occasions during AIR FORCE ONE when Petersen 
ratchets the tension up to a level where the viewer is likely to forget 
the imbecilic plot contrivances that have gotten the situation to this 
point, and just enjoy the action and adventure.  Unfortunately, every 
time dialogue and plot exposition interrupt the flow, we're reminded of 
how implausible the scenario is.  On top of that, the film is too long.  
The opening setup, which lasts nearly 30 minutes, is plodding (mainly 
because it's poorly written).  There's a little too much running around 
during the middle segment, and the movie's last third features no fewer 
than three endings.  
     The film belongs to Harrison Ford and Gary Oldman, both of whom 
turn in competent (albeit unexceptional) performances.  Neither has to 
stretch their range very far, since Ford is adept at playing the strong, 
competent hero, and Oldman has become typecast as the slightly-unhinged, 
scenery-chewing villain.  The supporting cast includes a number of 
familiar faces, but, other than Glenn Close, no one has much to do.  
William H. Macy, as a member of the President's military entourage, is 
especially underused.
     I had hoped that Petersen would bring some of the claustrophobic 
feel of DAS BOOT to AIR FORCE ONE (after all, both films take place 
almost entirely in the isolated confines of a cigar-shaped structure).  
However, rather than opting for the slow boil approach, Petersen has 
gone for high energy/low intelligence.  The result is passably 
entertaining, but not a standout.  AIR FORCE ONE offers two hours of 
flashy, instant gratification.  The only lingering effect is the 
slightly bad taste that occurs when you expect more from a film than it 
actually delivers.
- James Berardinelli
e-mail: berardin@mail.cybernex.net
ReelViews web site: http://www.cybernex.net/~berardin 

Author
Mike Borzumate

For details of my reviewing style, please see the note at the end of
the review.
    AFO held my attention consistently throughout.  In fact, several times
I found myself gasping for air as I got caught up in the action.  This is
a (perhaps surprisingly) solid action flick during a fairly sluggish
summer. 
    Harrison Ford is great.  You believe, for every second, that he really
is the President.  He not only displays bravery and courage, but also a
human side we sometimes forget our leaders have.  Almost completely absent
from this movie, unlike certain others in his past, were the moments when
he would try to pretend that he was frightened, but instead just looked
confused and lost.  In AFO, you actually believe he is scared turdless.
    Gary Oldman is a very convincing terrorist.  The radicalism he
conveyed made me, in some instances, so scared I was nervous and fidgety. 
His character is the kind of guy you are afraid could be a real terrorist: 
nutty, but intelligent and focused. 
    Now come the parts where I complain.  Glenn Close is a horrible
Vice-President.  Through the whole movie she looked old and tired, like
she couldn't wait to run off the set and jump into the jacuzzi.  I was
very, very glad when her short bits were over and we could get back to the
crisis at hand. 
    Liesel Matthews was similarly a horrible First Brat.  She displayed
very limited acting capabilities.  During every scene where she was called
upon to display a serious emotion, it always seemed like she was reading
the lines from a paper and grinning.  I didn't believe she was scared.  I
believed, instead, that she was excited by the terrorists threatening to
kill her.  Either that or she was too airheaded to understand what was
happening around her.  (A replacement that immediately comes to mind would
have been Hillary Wolf, but I guess she's a little old now to play a 12
year old.)
    Ignoring these two lame performances, this film is thoroughly
enjoyable and suspenseful, so you should see it.

I give two ratings: An arbitrary scale of enjoyability (1 to 10) and
a maximum price I would pay to see the movie.

Author
Steve Kong
On the surface Air Force One looks like a formula film, "Die Hard on a
plane." But, as the movie starts, we see that it is different, though not
much, from the formula. 
Harrison Ford is the President of the US, James Marshall.  And as the name
somewhat suggest, he is somewhat like a cowboy.
In a team effort between the US and Russia, the leader of rebellious
Kazakhstan is captured. The President is in Moscow giving a speech and
taking a stand against terrorism.  After the speech, the President boards
Air Force One and this is where the fun starts.
The movie opens with the capturing of the Kazakhstan leader.  This sequence
opens the film with a bang, and sets the mood for the rest of the film.
The film is packed with action, and surprisingly, most of it is well done
and takes place on Air Force One.  This is surprising because of the tight
quarters that the surrounds the action.  Some sequences that are of the
wow-factor are the refueling plane, the many gunfights, the C-140 sequence,
and the sequences with the F-15s.
As the plane is being hijacked, the President is put into an escape pod and
ejected.  But this would be too easy of a solution.  The President, with
the motivation to save his wife and daughter, stays on the plane,
unbeknownst to the terrorists.
Gary Oldman plays the terrorist.  He is a hard communist and wants to
reinstate Communism to Russia.  He and a team of men take over Air Force
One and threaten the Vice President (Glenn Close) and Defense Secretary
(Dean Stockwell).  Their threat is that if the leader of Kazakhstan is not
released, then one hostage will be eliminated each half-hour.
The story moves quickly, and the action is spectacular. There are some
minor details that bugged me, but not much.  The terrorists are near blind
and the President has a great shot.  The load of weapons on Air Force One
is incredible and somewhat easily accessible.  And for one minor character
we never do learn his motivation.
Ford, like always, is a joy to watch.  He gives a great performance in Air
Force One.  Oldman does a good job at his part also.  He is as much, and
maybe a little more intense than Ford. Wolfgang Petersen, who directed
Clint Eastwood in The Line of Fire, does a great job of building tension
and creating dazzling action. There is one character, which I won't name,
that is like the wrench in the wheel.  And this character lives almost to
the end of the movie.  All of this time making you wonder what the
character is going to do. I loved how this character was used, although
sparingly, in the film.
Air Force One is a late comer to the summer action movie territory, but it
makes up for this by being one of the most exciting films of this summer.
The action in Air Force One never really goes into the yeah-right category,
but is always in the wow-and-ouch category. Air Force One is a must-see
movie. And when you walk out of the theatre, you too will be saying like
me, "I'm proud to be an American!"        
--
steve kong
boiled@earthlink.net
spy on me at:  http://mookie.relay.net/mookie/steve-cam.html
movie reviews: http://hardboiled.home.ml.org/

Author
Michael Dequina
Air Force One (R) *** 1/2 (out of ****)
        If the President's private plane, Air Force One, were hijacked, it's
highly unlikely that President Clinton (or any real-life Chief Executive)
would go mano y mano with the terrorists.  But this is Hollywood, where
wimpy presidents just don't sell.  So we have Wolfgang Petersen's Air Force
One, an exciting, entertaining variation of the Die Hard formula where our
kick-ass hero is none other than the President of the United States.
        Right from the get-go, we know Harrison Ford's President James
Marshall is one take-no-crap guy.  We first see him at a dinner at the
Kremlin, where he and the Russian president (Alan Woolf) are celebrating the
capture of General Alexander Radek (Jurgen Prochnow), a fascist tyrant whose
brutal tactics wreaked havoc in Kazakhstan.  It is during this dinner that
he gives an impassioned speech saying that the United States will no longer
take action against such atrocities at the last minute, striking at the
first signs of trouble.  President Marshall gets his chance to back up his
words when, en route to Washington, Air Force One, is hijacked by a group of
Radek loyalists, led by Ivan Korshunov (Gary Oldman), demanding the
general's release.  With his wife (Wendy Crewson), daughter (Liesel
Matthews), and numerous staffers held hostage, it is up to President
Marshall to defeat the baddies and reassert America's reputation as the
leading global power.
        The basic conceit is a little far-fetched (then again, what action
movie plot isn't?), and given some of the clunky dialogue by screenwriter
Andrew W. Marlowe, sometimes it sounds ridiculous, too.  But while watching
the film, you buy it hook, line, and sinker, due in large part to the acting
talent on board.  Ford's commanding presence lends a sense of authenticity
to every project he's in.  It is one thing to be a convincing kick-ass
action hero and quite another to be believable as "the leader of the free
world"; not only does he pull off both without a hitch, but he also pulls
off the task fairly seamlessly.  When he is wacking a terrorist with a
stool, we also believe that this the president, doing what it takes to
protect his country; similarly, in more sedate presidential mode, we believe
that, when push comes to shove, he is capable of acting in such a violent
way.  Another huge acting asset is Glenn Close, serving as the plane's (and
the film's) dramatic anchor to reality as Vice President Kathryn Bennett,
who is the focus of the action in the White House.  Oldman is appropriately
restrained as Korshunov, wisely resisting the urge to camp it up as a lot of
action movie villains do these days.  Anything too over-the-top and outre,
like Oldman's turns in the Luc Besson films The Professional and The Fifth
Element, would seem too out of place here.
        But this is not to say that Air Force One is a gravely serious and
self-important championing of the American presidency.  Even though
President Marshall is a combat veteran who can more than hold his own in a
fight, he still is a desk jockey by trade.  He's no know-it-all gadget whiz
MacGyver; a lot of times he doesn't know what he's doing or how to do it.
The little comic touches, from little one-liners to scenes such as one where
he reads an instruction manual to a cellular telephone work not so much
because they are funny but because they also ring true (after all, wouldn't
the president have someone make his calls for him?).
        Air Force One does not offer as much character nor plot to chew on
as Petersen's last thriller involving the presidency, 1993's terrific Clint
Eastwood starrer In the Line of Fire, but it still delivers the goods--a
brisk pace, explosions, gunplay, fights, lots of airborne action, strong
acting, and, last and certainly not least, the legendary Harrison Ford.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  mj23@the18thhole.com
mrbrown23@juno.com  |  mrbrown@iname.com  |  mst3k@digicron.com
mj-23@geocities.com  |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Visit Mr. Brown's Movie Site at http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/
Personal Page: http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/home.html
Michael Jordan Sites:
http://members.tripod.com/~mj23/mj.html  &
http://www.geocities.com/Colosseum/Field/2302/
CONGRATULATIONS MICHAEL & THE BULLS!

Author
Steve Rhodes
     The movie AIR FORCE ONE should require a doctor's approval, for
those with weak hearts may not make it.  Just ten minutes into the
movie, my heart was racing and goose pimples had flared up all over my
body.  Although there would be brief interludes when I was able to
relax, most of the show found my adrenaline pumping right along with
President James Marshall's.  After the show ended I found myself
gasping for breath and trying hopelessly to reconnect with the real
world.  I had just been through such an incredible experience that I
found it hard to believe I was sitting in a theater.
     The director of AIR FORCE ONE is the great Wolfgang Petersen.  His
DAS BOOT is a cinematic masterpiece that blends heart-stopping action
with the story of real people in peril.  So it is with AIR FORCE ONE,
easily the best action picture of the year, but thanks to Petersen's
meticulous direction and first-time screenwriter Andrew W.  Marlowe's
well laid out script, the human equation is even more compelling.  The
intelligent and clever script has enough humor to break the tension
periodically.
     Harrison Ford is the president, and a darn good one, based on this
movie.  Ford brings a presence to the office while still imbuing the
character with humanity and fear.  President Marshall was a medal of
honor recipient in Vietnam, and Ford uses all of the tricks he learned
in his role as Jack Ryan in the movies based on Tom Clancy's novels.
In short, Ford delivers one of his best performances ever.  Next to the
direction, his acting is the second best part of the film.
     The story does cause one to suspend disbelief a bit, but the story
as delivered feels plausible even if there are many parts one could
quibble with.  INDIANA JONES AND THE TEMPLE OF DOOM was full of
ridiculous aspects but that did not detract from its beauty and neither
do the small liberties AIR FORCE ONE takes with the situation.
     When Gary Oldman (THE FIFTH ELEMENT) and his entourage enter the
President's plane masquerading as friendly Russian journalists, you
know what will happen.  Even if you haven't seen the trailers, an
unlikely situation, you know that Oldman's specialty is bad guys.  When
all hell breaks loose in the cabin, knowing it is inevitable does not
lessen the tension one iota.
     Petersen can stage action sequences so realistic that they seem to
literally suck the audience into the scene.  Ivan Korshunov, the leader
of the Russian dissidents, played by Oldman doing what he does best --
terrorists and lunatics, could not have been better cast.  He is
vicious in the action sequences, and chilling in his quieter
confrontations with the first family, underplayed by Wendy Crewson as
the First Lady, Grace, and Liesel Matthews (A LITTLE PRINCESS) as the
First (teenage) Kid, Alice.  "You murdered 100,000 Iraqis to save a
nickel a gallon on gas," he shouts at the First Lady.  "Don't lecture
me on the articles of war."
     "How the hell did this happen?" demands Vice President Kathryn
Bennett (Glenn Close).  "How the hell did they get Air Force One?"
Although she seems too stiff at first to be believable -- well, on
second thought, maybe that is plausible -- Close soon finds her footing
and manages to take control of a seemingly intractable situation,
complicated further by the political intrigue within the White House.
When people hesitate to carry out a strange order from the president,
she backs him all the way.  "He's not asking," she barks.  "The
commander-in-chief issued a direct order.  Now do it!"
     Dean Stockwell, as Defense Secretary Walter Dean, gives a
beautiful re-enactment of the Alexander Haig role when President Reagan
was shot.  "The presidency is bigger than one man," Dean shouts to an
underling not enamored with Dean's idea of shooting down the plane.
"Didn't they teach you that at Yale?"
     Once Korshunov gets control of the plane he announces that he will
execute a hostage every 30 minutes unless Communist and Nationalist
leader General Alexander Radek is released from prison.  In a tiny but
crucial role Jurgen Prochnow, the U-boat skipper from DAS BOOT, plays
General Radek.  The scene of him walking as the Communist
Internationale plays will not soon be forgotten.
     Petersen gets so many of the small details perfect.  To add to the
authenticity, he has the Russians talk to each other in Russian with
English subtitles, but has Korshunov speak English to the Americans.
In another small detail, he has the president get trapped like a rat in
a maze, not knowing where to turn to escape.
     Bravery rarely appears on the screen anymore, bravado having
replaced it.  Petersen brings back old fashioned bravery and makes it
credible.  Many individuals risk their lives to save their president --
from the first Secret Service agents who whisk the President away when
the firing starts to the ace pilot who puts his plane between a missile
and Air Force One in one of the film's stirring dogfight sequences.
     People in my charged-up audience were applauding sporadically
throughout the film.  And laughing occasionally at its humor.  Easily
the funniest line is Ford's.  When one of his aides suggests a
brilliant way out of their predicament, he tells her with a big smile,
"If this works, you get to be Postmaster General."  Speaking in
quasi-code, Marshall tells Bennett, "Kathryn, if you give a mouse a
cookie."  Understanding his meaning, she completes his sentence, "He's
gonna want a glass of milk."
     In a show that never flags for a moment, the endgame does not
disappoint.  Although the film is developed into a seamless whole
rather the traditional configuration of setup, body, and conclusion.
The suspense builds and the tension ratchets up until the end.  The
critic I was sitting next to, his girlfriend, my wife, and I all let
out a collective, "oh my god" type of sigh when the ending credits
finally rolled.  I have not seen a better movie this year.
     AIR FORCE ONE runs a blindingly fast 1:58.  It is rated R for some
bloody images, but overall I found the violence realistic but never
overdone or gory.  The film would be fine for teenagers.  I was blown
away by the picture so I give it my strongest recommendation and my top
rating of ****.
Opinions expressed are mine and not meant to reflect my employer's.

Author
Michael R. Thompson

For More Info:
http://www.spe.sony.com/Pictures/SonyMovies/movies/AFO/index.html
Rating(out of 10): 8.5 (10 if you live for action flicks)
I think that every summer there are a lot of disappointments in the
big budget action/thriller movie genre. It even gets a bit tedious
to go to a bunch of films, only to say, "Well, at least the air-
conditioning worked."  Fortunately, some good nail-biters come along
to make the summer a bit more exciting.  I wanted to endorse AIR FORCE 
ONE as being the best action/adventure film I have seen this summer.  
The action seens were good, the pace never slowed down, and the actors
were decent in their respective roles.  In fact, at one time, I thought
that starring in an action flick did not require all that much acting
talent (just look tough, stay out of the way of the special effects, and
deliver one catchy line).  However, I am starting to think that Harrison
Ford is a brilliant actor who can make us believe that he is scared 
sh**less one second, and then a moment later believe that he has 
forgotten that he could get killed if he attacks the guy with the gun.
Other reviewers may tell you that this material has been done, the
actors a and b were stiff or over the top, etc.  I don't disagree with 
them, but as a package, if you enjoy action films (like Die Hard), and 
don't care if this is the 3rd airplane thriller this year, then you will 
enjoy AIR FORCE ONE.  It is the best action film I have seen this year, 
not the best film overall, but easily the best of its genre.

Author
Homer Yen
Blending the action-gripping essence of Die Hard and the claustrophobic   
intensity of Executive Decision, the resulting elixir is a potent mixture   
in the form of Air Force One.  Being such, it is a high-flying adventure   
that offers a lot of roller-coaster style excitement in this airborne   
suspense thriller.
Harrison Ford stars as the President of the United States.  After Russian   
terrorists (led by the sinister Gary Oldman) somehow board the world's   
most advanced and secure airplane, they eventually overtake the   
presidential plane and hold everyone hostage, including several chiefs of   
staff, a bevy of secret service agents, and the president's family.  In   
exchange for the safe release of the hostages, the terrorists demand that   
the Russians release a recently captured military General, who was   
imprisoned for heinous acts of tyranny while in power.
It is an extraordinarily high price to pay for the hostages safety.  Not   
only do the Russians not want to release a madman that could undermine   
the stability of the Russian government, but the leadership at home, led   
by Glenn Close as a formidable Vice-President and Dean Stockwell as a   
must-take-action Secretary of Defense, also vehemently stands by   
America's principle to not negotiate with terrorists.  However, if his   
demands are not met, he will execute one hostage every 30 minutes.
Air Force One doesn't really amount to anything more than a simple story   
about the good guys trying to retake the plane and defeat the terrorists.   
 But it is the caliber of the actors and the fine ingredients thrown into   
the movie recipe that makes this summer fare worth sampling.  Ford is   
reliably charismatic as the President -- stern and tough, but still   
vulnerable when faced with decisions of the heart.  Ford becomes the   
anchor for all that is American; all that is good; all that is just ˜ and   
will die for his country.  Oldman plays his character with delicious   
intent as a psychotic militant bent on carrying out his demands.   Oldman   
is the anchor of future Russia (at least as he sees it).  He is equally   
willing to die for his beliefs as well.
Additionally, the movie incorporates several excitement-heightening   
components that keeps you at the edge of your seat.  There is the   
constant cat and mouse chase through the tight confines of the airplane.   
 There is constant ingenuity displayed as the adrenaline-rushed good guys   
try to find different ways to free the hostages or to land the plane.   
 But most of all, there is no doubt that of all the protagonists of the   
summer, there is no one worth rooting for more than the President (and   
America) -- the embodiment of truth, justice and the American way.  And,   
it was also interesting to see the capabilities of Air Force One, loaded   
with sophisticated gadgetry and advanced military technology.
Yet, despite this generally, excitingly, executed storyline, you'll find   
that the ending was somewhat of a letdown given all that had transpired   
as you question the motivations behind one of the main characters.  So   
much so, in fact, that it slowed much of the momentum as the movie wound   
to a close.  Nonetheless, the fast-paced action, the fine all-around   
performances, and the sheer enjoyment value of the film earned its wings.   
 I salute this fine summer offering.

Author
Jerry Saravia
Most action thrillers nowadays rely on countless explosions, dozens of
special-effects, wall-to-wall cartoonish violence, and enough gunfire to give
Schwarzeneger a headache. The idea is to essentially give the audience a
relentless assault on the senses and nothing more; some succeed such as
"Mission: Impossible," and others fail like the mediocre "Broken Arrow" and the
absurd "Ransom." Then there are the rare, humanistic, character-oriented
thrillers like "The Fugitive," the original "Die Hard," and the spectacular "La
Femme Nikita" and "The Professional," both directed by action whiz Luc Besson
who also helmed the offbeat "The Fifth Element." At least those films offered
more than the usual slam-bam-thank-you-mam action. "Air Force One" is exactly
what you might expect - explosions and action unashamedly standing in for
character and plot.
"Air Force One" is an incredulous thriller; an occasionally exciting yet
overbearing, feeble-minded piece where Harrison Ford plays the President of the
Unites States as a straight, righteous man with no flaws. As he boards the Air
Force One plane, Russian terrorists hijack it and hold all the presidential
aides and staff members hostage in exchange for the release of an imprisoned
Russian leader (Jurgen Prochnow). Ford is the kind of President who does not
believe in negotiating with terrorists, especially not one played by Gary
Oldman, so he fights mano-a-mano with them instead (imagine Abraham Lincoln
going mano-a-mano with John Wilkes Booth). The First Lady and her daughter are
also on the plane, and their lives are in danger if Ford does not comply with
the terrorists. 
Except for the novelty of having the President as the hero, "Air Force One" is
strictly a "Die Hard"/"Under Siege" rip-off taking place on a plane, e.g.,
"Passenger 57," "Turbulence," and the others before it. There's nothing here
that we haven't seen before and, most definitely, better. Harrison Ford makes a
decent hero, as always, Gary Oldman is terrifying to watch, and there's a
wonderful supporting cast including Glenn Close, Philip Baker Hall, Dean
Stockwell, etc. Let's be honest, though: what we have here is a lot of machine
gunfire and a high body count as compensation for a threadbare story, and a
scenario as ludicrous as the one in Clint Eastwood's "Absolute Power." Close,
but no cigar.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Author
Andrew Hicks
        Harrison Ford is one of the most beloved movie actors 
today and the airborne action flick is one of the most beloved movie 
genres today. It was only a matter of time before a team-up occurred. 
AIR FORCE ONE is the latest film to set its violence and carnage 
aboard a plane, although as the title suggests, it's the first to set its 
action in the American President's plane. The novelty of a butt-
kicking chief executive, and the performance of Ford as the 
president, makes this a watchable action thriller, but there are a lot 
of unbelievable sequences with less-than-credible special effects 
and bad writing that makes even Ford and Glenn Close look bad.
        Ford is an idealistic president with a picture-perfect family 
(a pretty wife and cute adolescent daughter, tipoff number one that 
Ford's character wasn't modeled after Clinton) who stuns the world, 
at the beginning of AIR FORCE ONE, by scrapping a scripted 
speech for an impromptu address that sounds even more scripted. 
He promises no tolerance on terrorism in a "be afraid, be very 
afraid" kind of speech that is sincere but suicidal in a political 
sense.
        Everyone climbs aboard Air Force One, a state-of-the-art 
luxury ship that looks like it cost the entire income tax of Wyoming. 
It sports some of the tightest security measures on the planet, as 
Russian "journalist" Gary Oldman and his "news crew" find out as 
they board. I put the words journalist and news crew in quotes 
because we all know by now that, whenever we see Oldman in an 
action movie, it spells disaster. He is a member of a psycho villain 
actors club -- the president of which is John Malkovich -- that grows 
continually smaller with every year.
        Luckily, Oldman's performance here, as a loyalist to a 
captured Russian Communist general, is much better than his work 
in this summer's earlier THE FIFTH ELEMENT, where he had fake 
glasses, prosthetic teeth and a muddled accent. As a Russian 
terrorist, he works much better; he's crazy but we at least understand 
his reasoning and loyalties. With Ford's character imperfect, the 
lines are blurred more than usual action flicks, although we always 
know who's good and who's evil.
        Oldman and his boys take the plane with lightning speed, 
but in a predictable fashion for anyone who's seen an airbound 
action thriller. It cuts way down on creativity to have a traitorous 
Secret Service man help them out with weapons, but the manic 
sequence that follows, with the terrorists killing existing Service 
men and Ford trying to escape via the escape pod, is good tense 
action. AIR FORCE ONE has an equal share of effective and 
misfired action sequences, although the downtime that dominates 
it is punctuated by some terrible dialogue.
        Most of it is due to intense overacting by those watching 
the drama unfold in Washington, D.C. Close is the Vice President, a 
level-headed woman with more balls than most of the men in the 
room, while Dean Stockwell, Secretary of Defense, is trying to 
wrestle power away from her. I don't know if director Wolfgang 
Peterson instructed them to act like that or what, but it's so over-the-
top it can't be taken seriously, and the way the loud score kicks in 
after every dramatic line or tense scene makes it even more 
unintentionally funny.
        The whole time, no one but Ford knows he's still aboard the 
plane, down in the hold shooting terrorists and sabotaging the plane. 
He's the president but he's still an action hero. That aspect of the 
film is fun to watch and root on, because none of the presidents 
we've had have been young or integrity-filled enough to do anything 
like that. AIR FORCE ONE isn't as classy as most Harrison Ford 
action films but fits right in with the current crop of summer 
entertainment.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Author
Dan Chodos
The concept of "Air Force One" is taken directly from the book of cliche.
But, y'know, there's a reason for cliches and why so many films revolve
around them -- they work. They make for good solid, entertaining stories.
But the negative connotation of the word cliche comes naturally with time
and overuse. Here we have Harrison Ford playing the President of the United
States who mumbles his way through a declaration of war on terrorist. His
plane, with family and all on board, is then hijacked. And we're off to the
races!
It's the same old routine to boot when our heroic president sacrifices
himself to save the plane and avert the evil Russian terrorist plans.
Instead of developing a character to root for, "Air Force One" relies on the
audience's patriotic obligation to cheer on our hero. He's the president,
represents America's resiliency in the face of danger, so we're clinging to
our arm rest with every terrorist he encounters, right? Wrong.
One thing "Air Force One" has going for it is terrific casting. The film is
a star vehicle as the audience wants to root for Harrison Ford more so than
the cardboard role of President Marshall. Everything plot related i.e. the
"bigger" picture such as some confusing scenes with the Russian prisoner
ends up being lost making the film not amount to much. The movie defines the
"been there done that" syndrome. I for one was hoping the President turned
out to be a coward, sacrificing his country and family to save his life. At
least that would have been refreshing.

Author
Michael J. Legeros
A movie review by Michael J. Legeros
Copyright 1997 by Michael J. Legeros
     Well, once again, a summer movie has surprised me.  This time, it's
AIR FORCE ONE, which is the long-sit of the season that *I* didn't see
coming.  As the trailers have trumpeted for the last six months, Har-
rison Ford plays President Ass Kicker, a Chief Executive who has to make
like Kurt Russell making like Steven Seagal making like Bruce Willis,
when *his* plane is hijacked by Russian loyalists.  (The Commander in
Chief is hurried into the escape pod, but chooses to hang around, be-
cause his wife and daughter are still aboard and, friends, that's one
family you just don't go messin' with.) Director Wolfgang Petersen (IN
THE LINE OF FIRE, DAS BOOT) is a bonafide master of claustrophobic com-
bat, I'll give him that.  We're always aware of the bad guys, no matter
what curtain they're hiding behind.  (Is the President's 747 really that
big on the inside?) And, with the help of visual effects supervisor
Richard Edlund, Petersen also pulls off a couple of breathtaking aerial
sequences.  (An aborted landing at Ramstein Air Base is an early show
stopper.  Cool crash trucks, too.)
     The problem-- well, one of them-- is that Petersen serves up a few
too many crises.  Three too many, to be exact.  Sure, the action, when
it finally gets rockin' and rolling, is a welcome relief to a talky
first hour.  But do we really need to wrap with attacking fighters *and*
an aerial rescue *and* one last, lurking bad guy?  Sigh.  The ending
also boasts the weakest special effects in the movie, including some
obviously computer-generated water wonders.  (All of which, like the
rest of the scenes, are accompanied by Jerry Goldsmith's head-pounding
score.  Please pass the aspirin.) Another big botch is the choice of
villains.  Really, the motives of the terrorists-- whose soft-spoken
leader (Gary Oldman) seeks the release of an imprisoned general-- are as
patriotic as any American character in the movie.  They've just chosen a
more violent means to their end.  (Well, almost.  As Oldman's character
takes pains to point out, the United States is quite fond of murder when
it comes to protecting *their* interests.  And "snap" goes another bad
guy's neck.) All in all, AIR FORCE ONE gives a convincing illusion of
being the most believable and ably constructed of the summer stock.
Watch with your eyes open, however, and you might agree that it's just
one more dumb, loud blockbuster. 

Author
SR Boone
     Two things prevent Wolfgang Peterson's (DAS BOOT, IN THE LINE OF
FIRE) lastest offering from suffering the same fate as the president's
jet in Air Force One. First is America's need for a president of
impeccable honesty, integrity, and action. Second is some terrific
computerized flight footage.
     Harrison Ford plays United States President James Marshall who
delivers a strong anti-terrorism speech in Moscow only to discover that
Air Force One has been infiltrated by Russian terrorists, led by Gary
Oldman, who seek a reestablishment of good old Mother Russia. Further
complicating Ford's world-wide call to arms against terrorism is the
presence of the First Lady and Daughter on the hijacked fortress. After
90 minutes of gunfire and bloody corpses, good triumphs over evil and
Ford has succesfully defended his title as Hollywood's leading action
hero.
     Ford and Oldman are terrific in the roles that suit them best:
Everyman and psychotic heavy. While Ford delivers the goods in the best
classic tradition in his well-conceived role, the multi-talented Oldman
is wasted in his; his character seems to be Hollywood's plea to bring
back the Cold War's black-and-white world. Ford has admitted he prefer's
these roles and Oldman fits in nicely, too. Regardless,  the acting is
never in question with these two.
     What is in question is the witer's decision to have Ford play with
big guns instead of big brains. Watching Air Force One, one recalls The
Fugitive and how a mediocre script was given a pulse by watching Ford
stay one step ahead of his pursuer by out thinking him; or In the Line
of FIre with it's philosophical cat-and-mouse games. This one is simply
Die Hard 4. It's a tired formula, but it still works.
     Standouts in a strong supporting are Dean Stockwell as a power
hungry Secretary of Defence and William H. Macy as a crew member of the
presidential liner.
      Throughout the high-altitude dramatics are some outstanding shots
of F-15s that come to Air Force One's aid. These are highlighted by two
impressive displays of Air Force One's defensive manueverings.
     Even with it's climax teetering on the edge of credibility, Air
Force One is a wildly entertaining ride from a director and star at the
top of their games.


Author
Kathy Glaser
I found myself biting my nails while watching Air Force One, even though
the film followed formula and the ending was predictable. There's really
nothing original in this film; it's simply a two-hour dose of adrenaline.
But Harrison Ford is terrific. Watching him play a hero President makes it
easy to forget the plot holes and just enjoy the action. 
After President James Marshall chucks his prepared speech and delivers a
tough anti-terrorist message in Moscow, his plane is hijacked by Russian
nationalists. President Marshall must now practice what he has just
preached and stand up to the terrorists. But it's difficult to say no to
their demands when they hold guns to the heads of innocent people. And
they're serious. The First Daughter witnesses deaths so gruesome that she
will have to spend years in therapy to deal with the trauma. 
The specific demand of the terrorists is for the release of an imprisoned
Communist general. And how did terrorists manage to board Air Force One
under the guise of being members of the press? A corrupt Secret Service
agent helped them, although his motive is never explained. An explanation
for his betrayal was perhaps considered irrelevant to the plot and
therefore not mentioned, or maybe it was left an intentional mystery. A
rule rarely broken in Hollywood is that every successful film deserves a
sequel, and Air Force One is a huge hit. Here's an idea for the studios:
the sequel could be a prequel, that is, show how the terrorists
masterminded the hijacking. It wouldn't be as action-packed as the
original, but as In the Line of Fire proved, the planning stages of a great
crime can be as exciting as the event itself. 
President Marshall doesn't have any great plan to outfox the terrorists
(although he is occasionally clever); he wins by sheer force. Anyone who
has not yet seen the film also knows that he wins, simply by looking at the
box-office receipts. Americans would not be filling up theaters to watch
their leader go down in defeat. 
Since Air Force One is first and foremost an action flick, there really
aren't any issues worth thinking about for long, except perhaps Gary
Oldman's terrorist character questioning America's moral superiority, by
remarking that the President caused the deaths of a hundred thousand Iraqis
just so Americans could save a nickel on a gallon of gas. But it's
questionable how many movie-goers even
remembered that line when the film ended. The film is supposed to be a
battle between good and evil, with no room for moral ambiguity. 
Air Force One is not a realistic film, but one can go along for the ride
and believe that Harrison Ford is President. Then the film is over and one
remembers who the real President is. The fantasy is a lot better than
reality.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott
For more reviews, go to www.nuvo-online.com and click on "film."
Its hard to imagine anyone better suited to play the President Of The 
United States Of America than Harrison Ford. Early in "Air Force One", he 
delivers a speech about human rights violations and says, "Never again 
will I allow political self-interest to deter us from doing what is 
morally right." With a fiercely determined look on his face, he addresses 
terrorists around the world, saying "We will no longer be afraid. Its 
your turn to be afraid." Ford delivers the speech perfectly, establishing 
President James Marshall as a man of great integrity, courage and moral 
resolve, the kind of President we all wish we could have. 
The combination of extremely well-detailed lead characters and a 
constantly escalating sense of tension is what makes "Air Force One" 
succeed. Director Wolfgang Petersen ("In The Line Of Fire", "Outbreak") 
is very good at creating winning action/thrillers out of preposterous 
scripts. "Air Force One" has holes in logic large enough to fly a plane 
through, but Petersen spins the tale so well that ultimately, it doesnt 
matter. 
"Air Force One" is "Die Hard" on an airplane, following that films 
formula completely. As in "Die Hard", a deranged mastermind (Gary Oldman) 
and his thugs take a group of people hostage in a confined space (the 
Presidential plane, Air Force One). Our hero (Ford) hides in the bowels 
of the confined area, gets his bearings, then begins picking off the bad 
guys one at a time, enraging the mastermind even more. While trying to 
save the day, our hero establishes a link with an cohort on the outside 
(Vice-president Glenn Close by cell phone), who offers assistance and 
moral support. Of course, despite all outside aide, ultimate victory can 
only be achieved if our hero, assisted by his courageous fellow hostages, 
manages to personally kick the crap out of the deranged mastermind.
Of the many "Die Hard" clones, "Air Force One" works far better than most,
 because Petersen understands the importance of the human equation. He 
firmly establishes the character of President Marshall and his strong 
relationship with his wife and daughter, then pulls the rug out from 
under these characters lives. Its disturbing watching the President 
getting beat up by thugs, because we know and respect the man and the 
office he represents. Likewise, when members of the Presidents staff are 
killed, their deaths actually register emotionally, as opposed to most 
films, where the body counts feel incidental.
Petersen also understands that a "Die Hard" clone cannot work without a 
memorable villain, and Gary Oldman does the job nicely. Oldman plays Ivan 
Korshunov, a zealot obsessed with his goal of restoring a fanatical 
military dictator to power and destroying the evil he believes America 
represents. Oldmans eyes glisten with psychotic passion as he rants and 
threatens those around him. Again, the human factor is established as he 
talks about his family while his expression softens momentarily. One 
scene, where Korshunov leans over and kisses the Presidents daughter on 
the forehead, is especially chilling because the motive of his gesture is 
unclear. Did he kiss the child because she touched a memory of his own 
children or was the kiss an act of subtle terrorism, reminding the First 
Family of his absolute power over whether they live or die? Oldmans 
accent is sometimes shaky, but his performance is powerful.
The supporting cast does the best they can. Glenn Close is credible as 
the extremely focused Vice-president. Unfortunately, Vice-presidents 
generally dont have much to do, and sadly, neither does Close. Dean 
Stockwell is effective as the Defense secretary, who attempts to use the 
nightmarish situation for a political power play.
The special effects in "Air Force One" range from seamless to pretty bad. 
A computer-generated aircraft crash looks particularly phony. Computer 
graphics, trumpeted as the means towards visualizing the impossible, all 
too often look merely like overly sleek overlays. For every great 
computer-generated scene, like those of Shep, the elephant who thinks 
hes a dog in "George Of The Jungle", we have to suffer through scenes 
like the plane crash in "Air Force One", which resembles one of those 
cheesy visuals presented in motion-simulators at amusement parks.
The pacing of "Air Force One" lags a bit towards the end, largely because 
the film has no less than three obvious endings, but enough nit-picking. 
The bottom line is that "Air Force One" works. Wolfgang Petersen may have 
ripped off "Die Hard", but he did his work extremely well. Thanks to his 
expertise and exceptional work from Harrison Ford, "Air Force One" 
emerges as one of the summers most thrilling escapist films.

Author
Justin K. Siegel
AIR FORCE ONE -- a movie review by Justin Siegel
Harrison Ford is the president of the United States.
No really, Harrison Ford _is_ the president of the United States. If I 
were an American citizen and was of legal age and woke before noon one 
day, I'd vote for him. He's my hero, man. I mean, when he's up there 
battling terrorists, being a family-man and fighting tooth-decay, I don't 
worry about him. He'll be A-Okay! If it were Bill Clinton up there, then 
I'd be scared, but come on, this is Harrison Ford. They should've handed 
out little buttons that say "Vote for Harrison Ford this July!" after the 
movie.
Ford is one of the many good things AIR FORCE ONE (or AFO to those who 
are too cool for their own good) has going for it. Others are Glenn 
Close, William H. Macy (the guy from FARGO), director Wolfgang Petersen, 
and a great script. One thing going against it is the 
impausability-factor. While it's not as high as that of FACE/OFF, where 
two men swap faces, it's easily as high as CON AIR, in which a handful of 
prisoners highjack an airplane.
What is it with all the implauable movies this summer?
After giving an emotional speech about how the USA will not negotiate 
with terrorists and locking up some sort of Russian comrade, President 
Harrison Ford heads back to Air Force One in a limo, looking forward to 
watching a football game and spending some time with his acting-impared 
12-year-old daughter.
Not so easy, because this time, loyallist to the aformentioned Russian 
comrade Gary Oldman has, with the help of someone who is supposed to be 
on President Ford's side, hijacked Air Force One. He will kill one 
hostage (there are like, 50, including the first lady, first daughter, 
and first monkey) every half-hour until the Russian comrade that they 
locked up is released.
Silly Russian. Didn't anyone ever tell him not to mess with Harrison 
Ford?
President Bill Clinton has said he's seen this film twice. _Twice_. This 
is the busiest, most powerful man in the world and he's seen this film 
_twice_. Then he goes home and has a nice long jacuzi. It's funny -- I 
can just imagine him swinging from a cable dangling from a diving plane. 
He's lucky he let Harrison Ford do that for him.

Author
Gerald Forshey
        It is interesting how hard it is for film makers not
to make the same films they or others made in the past.
Director Wolfgang Petersen turns Gary Oldham into John
Malkovich's character from _In the Line of Fire_, almost 
investing him with the same attitudes and speeches.  Then
he tries to make sense out of the airplane like he did in the
submarine of _Das Boot_.
        Then he takes the arrogance of the President's 
speech about terrorists should be very afraid, and turns
it on him by making him choose between his family and 
political suicide.  And that's only in the previews!!!
        Of course, there is moral cause injected...Oldham
tells one of the people he holds hostage that he will not take
moral instruction from a nation that killed 100,000 Iraqis, but 
it passes like no one really meant it anyway.  Movies like this
like having moral clauses in them, but they must be passed 
over quickly before the audience starts having real moral qualms
themselves about all the killing (the President gets to kill with 
moral fervor).
        But the formula is lifted from the Arnold /John Maclain/ 
Steven Seagal movies.  They are put in an alien environment by
some form of treachery, then assorted atrocities are committed,
they begin to make inroads while passing through all sorts of 
troubles, are captured, and by some superhuman effort of will
(which of course means shedding their own blood) they manage
to free themselves and then reverse the situation.  The openings
come from James Bond movies, as do the endings, replete with
memorable statements as the killers are dispatched.
        What is corrupt about this is that he gets to make two
right choices which are contrary to one another (notice I didn't
say contradictory), and get away with it.  That is what the 
audience loves eventually.  Then when the trouble is dispatched
Lotte Lenya (or someone else) comes back to kill Bond, while 
some other fatal threat is hanging over them.
        Ford is our Gary Cooper or late Bob Mitchum these 
days.  It is about his presence, not about his acting.  He said
on a talk show, he didn't want to change his clothes for the 
film, that they should show the changing circumstances.  I 
think that was the right choice, since they change more than
he does in the movie. What ever happened to the Ford of _The
Mosquito Coast_ or _Presumed Innocent_ or even _A Clear and
Present Danger_?
        And the explosions?  They write plots with explosions 
in them so dark screens can go yellow and orange. Who says 
abstract art is not pop art?
        It is all annoyingly pleasant.  It is all about money and
technique, and built for an audience for whom moral questions
are problems occasionally for politics and business, but never
the popular art.  But it does have its moments, such as when
Ford has to read the instructional manual in order to make a 
cel phone call.  It might one of the few moments of truth in the
movies recently.

Author
Jesse Kaplan
Air Force One A Film Review By Jesse A. Kaplan
cast Harrison Ford, Gary Oldman, Glenn Close, Wendy Crewson, Xander Berkeley
Directed by Wolfgang Petersen
 Before I make any comments about this flic let me say this,
at the last Harrison Ford movie I saw, THE DEVIL'S OWN, I was dismayed
at the show and how mediocre it was.  I began wondering the impossible,
IS Harrison Ford getting to old for action movies?  The verdict, most
definitely not.
 Ford (STAR WARS, RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK) stars at James Marshall,
The President of The United States who must respond single handily as
his plane, Air Force One, is hijacked by Russian Extremist terrorists led
by Ivan Korshunov, Gary Oldman (THE FIFTH ELEMENT, MURDER IN THE FIRST).
THe terrorists demand the release of the great rebellious Russian leader,
General Alexander Radek.  The President must respond as the free world
is held hostage.
Thinking Marshall has Escaped, Oldman and his thugs put their plan into
action.  However, as a chief of White House staff puts it, "(Marshall)
knows how to fight."  Marshall surprises the terrorists and does what he
can to save the day.
On the ground, Vice President Katherine Bennett (Glenn Close, 101 DALMATIANS),
is a resourceful and knowledgeable leader, helping to bring about the
safety of the hostages which include Marshall's wife and daughter.
The Music is exciting and the shots of AF1 look great.  It seems that no
expense in the air was saved as great shots of the planes are seen.  The
computer special imagings are also quite god and realistic.
Ford is terrific as President.  So many actors have recently tried the
role.  Some look good as Michael Douglas in THE AMERICAN PRESIDENT,
others ridiculous such as Jack Nicholson or Bill Pullman.  Ford acts
diplomatically and distinguished but is also a first rate ass kicker.
However, Oldman steals the show.  As Ivan Korshunov he plays the role almost
too convincingly.  While on screen, I loathed his prescience.  Rude,
Nasty, and evil, Oldman is the best villain in Hollywood.  Close is also
quite good as VP and Xander Berkeley, William H. Macy, and  Wendy Crewson
are excellent in smaller supporting roles.
AIR FORCE ONE checks in at a little over 2 hours and by the end my
adrenaline was flowing.  Certainly the best action movie of the summer
so far, a little better (and even more realistic!!!) then FACE/OFF.
Could the events in this film actually happen?  Probably not.  Is it
far fetched?  Definitely, but its Hollywood and a great Harrison Ford
movie.   I recommend this film to all and give it my top rating of
**** (Rated R for graphic violence and language)
 Copyright 1997 paladin@mhv.net  Jesse A. Kaplan

Author
Phil Brady
Jim Croce died entirely too young, so he can be forgiven for not
including Harrison Ford in the above lyric. How dumb a terrorist to you
have to be to take on Harrison Ford? Most people don't mind seeing Die
Hard VII, as long as our most stalwart hero plays the lead. The movie
poster lets you know what you're buying, since it's one big close-up of
Ford. And who could make a better president? Harrison might even be able
to pull in enough votes to get the real job, but I doubt that he would
want to "step down," let alone suffer a horrendous pay cut.
Simple enough: perennial wacko villain Gary Oldman hijacks Air Force
One and the prez battles his way out against impossible odds. On the
ground, Glenn Close makes a good vice president, dealing with the
terrorists, the cabinet, the military, and scariest of all - the press.
William Macy didn't get his Oscar for Fargo, but he did get more work.
Here he plays a general involved in much of the onboard action. Poor
Jurgen Prochnow gets underused as a captured Russian general - to be
traded for the president. Special effects? - the (2nd) best reason for
reprising Die Hard is an imaginative array of stunts and CGI aerial
sequences.
The movie has the obligatory innocents - the prez's wife and
daughter and executed hostages from the White House staff. You also have
to swallow that the Russian terrorists can get onboard in the first
place. Here, a Secret Service agent is the inside man, but his
motivation is never explained. Small quibbles, though, since such
underpinning is invariably present in this genre, and this is certainly
one of the better efforts. Die Hard I is still my favorite, though..Gary
Oldman could learn a few things from Alan Rickman about villainy (and
picking varied roles, too).

Author
Edwin Jahiel
AIR FORCE ONE  ***  Directed by Wolfgang Petersen. Written by Andrew W.
Marlowe.Cinematography, Michael Ballhaus. Production design, William
Sandell. Editing, Richard Francis-Bruce. Music, Jerry Goldsmith, Joel
McNeely (additional). Cast: Harrison Ford ( President James Marshall), Gary
Oldman (Ivan Korshunov), Glenn Close (Vice President Kathryn Bennett),
Wendy Crewson (Grace Marshall),  Liesel Matthews (Alice Marshall), Paul
Guilfoyle (Chief of Staff), Xander Berkeley (Agent Gibbs), William H. Macy
(Major Caldwell),  Dean Stockwell  (Defense Secretary) ,Tom Everett (NSA
Advisor), Jürgen Prochnow (General Alexander Radek),  et al. A Beacon &
Sony/Columbia release.125 min. Rated R. (Violence, language).
When the Soviet Union dissolved, Hollywood political action-thrillers lost
their favorite enemy. But it was only a matter of time until a substitute
could be found, "AFO" opens with a daring raid by US and Russian commandos
on the Presidential Palace of Khazakstan , a breakaway, independent
republic since 1991. Many guards are killed. General Radek (Jurgen
Prochnow)  the vicious, tyrannical, terrorist-sponsoring President, and a
menace to Russia, is abducted and taken to a Muscovite prison.
At a Moscow conference US  President Marshall (Harrison Ford) makes a
watershed declaration: America will no longer intervene abroad only if US
interests are involved, but also when Evil menaces Good anywhere. It's a
stirring speech that in real life would raise many a political eyebrow. It
gets thunderous applause.
The President, his wife, their 12-year old daughter, a large entourage plus
members of the press board the USA-bound Air Force One plane. The sequence
is impressively staged and photographed. But you guess right away that some
"reporters" are really terrorists and that one American Secret Service man
is a traitor.
Exhausted President Marshall is a regular guy, a happy family man who just
wants a beer while watching a football game on tape. The First Lady looks
nice but is not glamorized. She has some patriotic, duty-first dialogues
with her man, somewhat in Jimmy Stewart style. Daughter Alice (from "The
Little Princess") is  charming.
The terrorists take over the plane, using its huge resident arsenal. The
action is extremely violent. Dead Americans litter the aircraft.  Gary
Oldman (as Ivan Korshunov) is the forceful, devilishly clever, intuitive,
well-prepared leader of the phony newsmen. Excellently cast Oldman speaks
perfect English with a Russian accent. I would trust him to sell me vodka,
but otherwise Korshunov is a frightening monster, a paranoid, True Believer
in Communism. He demands the immediate release of Kazakh President Radek,
otherwise every half-hour he will execute a hostage. He does just that.
At the White House,  the Government's  civilian and military bigwigs
gather, presided over by Vice President Glenn Close. (Bully for this; high
time we had a woman in this post or as First Citizen). Close's performance
is emotional yet efficient. As  a bonus, it also involves her in a
tug-of-war with ambitious Defense Secretary Dean Stockwell. From Europe,
fighter planes get in the act.
This is as far as I will go into the plot without spoiling the suspense of
this recommended movie. And there is plenty of suspense fast, gripping,
suspending your disbelief or numbing your senses to the point that you
ignore much of the action's ludicrousness. Of course you know all along
that after costly battles, the end will find the First Family alive and
well. The suspense, while not nail-chewing about the final outcome ( the Z
on an A to Z scale), works well during the tense events that run from B to
Y. You might get a bit impatient, but not bored.
Harrison Ford's role makes no major demands on his acting,  Gary Oldman's
performance is far more notable. But the choice of Ford as the lead in a
"guy movie" was cleverly calculated to attract many female fans of the now
55-year-old actor.
That Harrison could lose, especially playing a President, is
unconstitutional. That this is a Ford actioneer means he is at heroic
center-stage in "AFO."  That he was a Vietnam hero and Medal of Honor air
ace, skilled and self-sacrificing, are attributes essential to the plot.
There's no scarcity of other clichés. When push comes to shove, President
Marshall transforms himself from world statesman into Indiana Jones,  a
paragon of pugilism, daring, inventiveness and skills. We get mano a
mano-type duels down to the final triumphant face-off.  Or tricks of the
suspense trade that involve a cellular phone, a fax, a gun that the
President gives the traitor in the only ironical scene that made the
audience titter.
The real and new star of the movie is the AFO plane. For the hordes who fly
in steerage AFO is a wonder. The picture does a great job of special
effects and recreating the plane without any plans or much information.
President Clinton has seen the movie twice, both times during flights in
Air Force One.  About the plane's authenticity he declared that "As far as
I know there is no escape pod and I don't think we have quite the arsenal
on there, and there is no back door." He might have added the real plane's
conference room is much smaller. Mr. Clinton "liked a lot" this "very good
movie."
The photography, production values,  and almost all special effects, are
tops. German-born director Wolfgang Petersen skillfully combines in one
work his interest in people in confined spaces (the submarine film "Das
Boot"), a tricky genre, and in Presidential assassinations ("In the Line of
Fire").
I cannot think of the film as literally "entertaining." There is something
disturbing about so many killings and about the psychological trauma of a
12-year old who has witnessed so executions. The story has major gaps. What
was the mechanism of the terrorists' (and the traitor's) preparation?; how
exactly could they fool elaborate security? why did the Secret Service man
(whose has small, vague part) betray? what are the specifics of General
Radek's crimes?
One may wonder what Khazakstan will think of this movie. And whether a
terrorist takeover of AFO  could occur in reality. The chances may be
minute yet for most of us far more credible in "AFO"  than UFO.

Author
Jeff Walters
       Unlike L.A. Confidential - this movie made an absolute
TON of money at the box office. This in itself was very
surprising as I've yet to hear anyone but my brother talk about
this movie with any great enthusiasm. Airforce One is your
standard stock Hollywood Blockbuster....which was
disappointing. I did enjoy it to a certain degree as I'm a big
Harrison Ford fan, but it just wasn't anything special.
         This movie suffers from something that a lot of movies
in 1998 have in that in tries to cram too many things into it.
Some might say that it is to keep the pace of the film going, but
it just got a bit tiresome and the movie felt a lot longer than
two hours. It definitely followed the rule of 'more explosions is
better'. Unlike a lot of FX movies this year though, Air Force One has
a bit of substance to it. The plot, while not so original, is
handled more intelligently than many movies of this genre.
         Harrison does, as usual, a great job as the lead. Even
playing the U.S. President he portrays his typical down to
earth/ordinary man character. You did have to 'suspend your disbelief'
numerous times during the movie though when the 50+
year old President is duking it out with 25 year old trained
terrorists and always coming out without a bruise. My kingdom for a
hero who ends up with a black eye! 
  Gary Oldman did a terrific job as the head terrorist, but the
character he was given to work with was really no different to those
seen in many other movies of this type. I was not terribly impressed
by Glenn Close, but that was mainly because of the character she
played. She is made out to be one of the heroes at the end for not
signing the motion to take away the President's powers, even though
his judgement was clouded. If Harrison hadn't 'saved the day' in the
end she would have been responsible for allowing the release of a
 homicidal madman responsible for 10 000's of deaths in
return for the half-dozen people left on the plane at that
stage. I personally did not see her decision as something
to cheer about no matter what happened at the end.
        The highlights? For me the best part was the initial
taking of the plane. It was so quick and 'full-on' that it was
genuinely startling even though you knew it was coming. The race to
get the President into the escape pod was one of the most exciting
sequences I've seen in a movie this year. The special effects
were much better than I expected, with the exception of the final
crash scene which was more than slightly unconvincing.
     One of the real faults of this movie was that some important
things integral to the plot were left unexplained. Chief among
these is the traitor inside the Secret Service detail. Why, after the
plane was taken, did he remain with the captives? Why did he
wait until the end when all his terrorist comrades were dead before
pulling a gun on the President? This made no sense at all.
     Looking back, this was an enjoyable movie held together by Ford's
typically charismatic performance and some nice FX
and action sequences. But as a whole it was not something to write
home about. I felt Executive Decision (another plane hijack
movie starring Kurt Russell) was a much better movie. Less special
effects than this movie, but the suspense was built up
extremely well towards the conclusion. Air Force One is one of the
better "Die Hard in a {insert location here}" clones, but a
clone is what it was. Nothing new here...

Author
Christopher Null
     When one sees Glenn Close portraying the vice-president, one begins
to realize just how much she looks (and can act) like Gerald Ford.
     Frankly, I was shocked to discover how much I liked AIR FORCE ONE. 
Yes, it has villainous Russians who can never see our good guy President
(Harrison Ford) when he's hiding right in front of them (much less shoot
him).  Yes, it has Secret Service guys who die at the hand of the enemy
like flies in a bug zapper.  Yes, it has the cheesiest special effects
this side of of a "Tom & Jerry" cartoon.  Yes, it features a rambling
Gary Oldman in one of his clearly improvised looney-tune
terrorist/psychopath roles.  I could go on and on...
     But I won't.  Instead, I'll tell you that AIR FORCE ONE (DIE HARD
on a plane with a President on it, thus distinguishing it from DIE HARD
II, PASSENGER 57, and EXECUTIVE DECISION) is a spellbinding film, one
that grips the viewer from the very start and doesn't let up until 140
minutes later, plot holes or no.  It also may be the funniest movie I've
seen all year -- and I still can't figure out if it was intentional or
not!
     And I don't care.  AIR FORCE ONE has great action, a good story,
and once you get past the melodramatics of his co-stars, one of Harrison
Ford's best performances, ever.  In fact, I'd be so bold as to say that
AF0 is probably the best new film of 1997 to date.
-Christopher Null  /  null@poboxes.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Author
Tim Voon
Cast: Harrison Ford, Gary Oldman, Glenn Close, Wendy Crewson, Liesel
Matthews, Paul Guilfoyle, Xander Berkeley, William H. Macy, Dean
Stockwell, Jurgen Prochnow Directors: Wolfgang Petersen Screenplay:
Andrew W. Marlowe
When a 50 year old man dances about an aeroplane dispatching terrorists
half his age, I begin to understand the terms "Gung Ho" or "Big balls
with small jocks". This man is a "Congressional Medal of Honour" winner,
he served in NAM and is also a devoted husband and loving father. He is
a man who has impeccable character and would without hesitation place
his family and Nation above himself. He is the President of the Untied
States.
Wait a minute. Am I missing something here? We are talking about the
President of the Untied States. You mean people like Clinton, Reagan,
Bush and maybe Gore? Or have we somehow confused them with Hollywood
action heroes like Segal, Van Damme, or Harrison Ford per se. Then
again what we want to believe and what we actually have is two different
things, and believe me the President of the United States is no action
hero.
If anything this movies serves to give the American People a good reason
to pat themselves on the back. It seems condescending when they dish out
freebie favours for a struggling Russian government made to look weak
and pathetic in the movie. What gives them the right to take the burden
of protecting the free world upon their own shoulders?  What's happened
to the United Nations? This is two hours worth of solid American
patriotic propaganda. When the Vice President is a female and the
President is an action hero we delude ourselves into believing the world
is almost perfect. The day that I actually see an American President
actually follow through with the claim that he well put world justice
and peace above his own political agenda, will also be the day I apply for
citizenship.
However unbelievable this movie maybe, it did make me hyperventilate
with laughter, and I laughed harder than most in the cinema. So if one
can put aside their disbelief that this is actually an Amercian
President come fighting machine, the action will keep you entertained
for the duration of the flight and fight. Harrison Ford is getting
older, and it is becoming more difficult to see him kill men half his
age and twice his size in hand to hand combat. Gary Oldman has that
something Russian worked out to the fine details of facial tics, stares
and hand gestures. It is unlikely that Air Force One will ever be
hi-jacked, but should the scenario occur it should be interesting to
follow the outcome. That way we can look back and see how wrong this
movie actually is.

Author
Michael Rizzo
        It's a curious comment on the state of Hollywood that the most
realistic action hero offered up in any of this year's summer blockbusters
is the President of the United States.  Judging from "Air Force One"'s
opening weekend box office, we as an audience, even in this modern age of
cynicism and distrust of our nation's leaders, are more than willing to
believe that the President would defend himself, his family, and his
country with his fists as easily as he would with military strikes and
smart bombs.  Why?  Two words: Harrison Ford.  In "Air Force One", Ford
adds to his mile-long list of action fits while giving the audience a
two-hour lesson in star power.
        The setup of "Air Force One" is fairly easy to follow.  An allied
group of U.S. and Russian commandos raid the Presidential Palace of
Khazakhstan, overthrowing and imprisoning the hard-line Khazakhstani
Communist leader, General Radek.  U.S. President Marshall(Ford), at a
banquet in Moscow, follows this with a speech condemning Radek's
brutality, replete with a vow to fight terrorism throughout the world.
Ford makes a stately and noble chief executive; he embarks on this new
policy, not because his re-election campaign is coming up, but because,
"It's the right thing to do."  Once again, an idealism that we as
Americans wish our leaders still had.  After the banquet, Ford retires to
his plane, the actual AFO, for the flight home with his wife(Wendy
Crewson) and daughter(Liesel Matthews).  We see the president as a doting
father and loving husband, and a football fanatic who'd rather watch the
game with a beer than sit through another policy meeting; we see the
President as an average guy.  Unbeknownst to him and everyone else on
board, however, a group of Russian terrorists, led by psycho
extraordinaire Gary Oldman, have boarded the plane with the aid of a
duplicitous Secret Service agent, disguised as a news crew on a press
tour.
        Of course, the terrorists take over the plane, kill a few people,
and go looking for the President; they want him to influence the Russian
president to release Radek.  Before Oldman and company can get to him, the
Secret Service whisk Ford off to his Presidential escape pod.  Believing
that the Prez has escaped, Oldman goes to Plan B.  He uses AFO's
communications system to contact Washington, and informs Vice President
Glenn Close that he intends to kill a hostage every half hour until Radek
is released.  Predictably, the Cabinet is in disarray.  Close squabbles
with the Scretary of Defense (Dean Stockwell)over authority; a humorous
moment arises when the Cabinet can't find a copy of the Constitution to
figure out wh exactly is in charge.  They know something that Oldman
doesn't:  Ford wasn't in the escape pod.  Unfortunately, they don't know
if he's alive or dead, so they also don't know if he's still the
President.
        This is where the action begins in earnest.  Ford sneaks around
the underneath of the plane, trying to figure out a way to save his family
and the other hostages.  Soon, Oldman notices that he's losing men, and
begins looking for whoever is attempting to foul up his plans.  Much of
the film from this point feels like a high-stakes version of "Die Hard" on
an airplane, and it is, but "Air Force One" is also complex, well-acted,
and its action scenes will leave you breathless.  Oldman gives the film an
intense, brooding energy as the buzz-cut psycho leading the hijacking,
alternately exuding justifying ideology, uncontrollable rage, and cool,
collected malevolence.  His telephone conversations with Close are
chilling.  He is every bit as solid and contolled here as he was
outlandish in "The Fifth Element"; this film loses a little steam with his
demise.  Close is a convincing VP, all nerves as she attempts to sort out
the mess while defending the President's course of action.  "Fargo" Oscar
nominee William H. Macy lends a hand as an Air Force officer who aids the
President in retaking the plane.  The real stars, though, other than Ford,
are director Wolfgang Petersen and the model AFO he has created.
Petersen's trademark claustrophobic action (I recently read a review which
referred the film as "Das Plane") is in good effect here; it's a surprise
Bruce Willis hasn't sought out Petersen.  The tense action and fantastic
in-air effects (Check out the exploding fuel tanker and the fighter plane
battle.  Only one of the effects shots doesn't work - you'll know which
one when you see it...) help Petersen overcome a somewhat implausible,
often corny script by first-time Screenwriter Andrew W. Marlowe.  Even
with all of this going on around him, though, everything centers on Ford.
He is worth every penny of his reported $20 million salary in this, his
best actioner since "The Fugitive" and his return, after the disappointing
grosses of "Sabrina" and "The Devil's Own", to the box-office throne to
which he is accustomed.  One amusing final note:  A friend with whom I saw
"Air Force One" couldn't understand why everyone in the film spoke so
reverentially of Ford's President Marshall.  I have no doubt that if
Harrison Ford himself were President, he'd receive the same reverence.

Author
Ben Hoffman
You must know that you are in for a thrill when the director of
one of the best films ever made, DAS BOOT, is in charge.  No one
compares to Wolfgang Petersen when it comes to making superb
films.   Witness, in addition to DAS BOOT, IN THE LINE OF FIRE and
OUTBREAK. Petersen, assisted by a great cast, does not disappoint.
AIRFORCE ONE, from beginning to end, is one frantic, tense action
film.
President John Marshall (Harrison Ford) has frequently proclaimed
that to give in to terrorists only invites more terrorism.  If he
is ever faced with a decision about terrorists, his message is
clear.  But what happens when his wife (Wendy Crewson) and teen
aged daughter (Liesel Matthews) are being held hostage aboard the
supposedly secure Airforce One, the President's plane? Perhaps not
quite as easy to be objective. That is exactly what faces President
Marshall.
Aided by a traitor on the staff of the President's security team,
a group of terrorists is allowed on the plane. They are supposed
to be a camera crew.   Soon after takeoff, they hijack the plane
and take everyone prisoner, except for the President himself who
is in hiding.   Leader of the terrorists is Ivan Korshunov (Gary
Oldman with a very, very thick Russian accent) who wants the
President to get the release of Gen. Alexander Radek (Jurgen
Prochnow . . . who was the captain in DAS BOOT).  Radek is a
tyrant who has been taking advantage of the chaos in Russia since
they were freed of the Communist yoke.   Gen. Radek is in a
Russian prison.
Meanwhile, back in Washington, D.C., Vice President Kathryn Bennett
(Glenn Close) is trying to find out what is happening.  When she
becomes aware of the demands, she phones Russian President Petrov
(Alan Woolf) to release Radek so President Marshall will not be
harmed. . . but Petrov says he is unable to do that.
But this is an action thriller and President Marshall is a capable
opponent of terrorists as he has served with distinction in Viet
Nam and knows how to handle himself in tough, dangerous
situations.   Harrison Ford is utterly believable as he hides in
various parts of the huge plane, shoots automatic weapons at the
enemy when he has a chance, wrestles with the terrorists while
hanging near an open hatch.  A little humor (very little) is
injected when Marshall throws one of the terrorists out the hatch,
exclaiming, "Get off my plane."
Exciting film.  Great cast.  You will not want to miss this one.
Other supporting roles are by Paul Guilfoyle, Xander Berkeley.
Wm. H. Macy, Dean Stockwell, Tom Everett and many others too
numerous to mention.

Author
Paul McElligott
"Air Force One" probably would have seemed like a retread even if it
hadn't followed "Executive Decision" by a year, but the existence of
other film sure doesn't help. 
The plot deals with the hijacking if the eponymous aircraft by a band of
Russian "ultra-nationalists" led by Gary Oldman, who want to free their
leader, General Radek ("Das Boot's" Jürgen Prochnow).  The terrorists
think that the president (Harrison Ford) has escaped, but he's really
hiding in the bowels of the plane, getting ready to start kicking some
Ruskie butt.
That this story has plot holes big enough to fly a 747 through them is
probably not a surprise to people familiar with this sort of "'Die Hard'
on a ____________" movie.  Unfortunately, this film falls down exactly
where more successful movies of this sort shine, with clearly understood
motivations for the bad guys.  Gary Oldman's character is easy enough to
relate to, but the film's writers clearly have no clue when it comes to
post-Soviet Russian politics.  For an "ultra-nationalist", he sure rants
and raves like a dedicated communist.  Anyone who knows anything about
Russia today knows that ultra-nationalists are anything but communists.
The key motivation for making this story believable, that of the
traitorous Secret Service agent (Xander Berkley), is never explained. 
What would make this man betray the president he swore to protect with
his life?  Money?  Is he a closet commie?  Why?
Another gaping whole is the story comes when Ford orders one of the
fighters trailing the plane to fires missile to set off Air Force One's
defenses, thus helping Ford to overpower one of the terrorists.  I don't
know, but if I had hi-jacked a plane and then someone fired a missile at
it, I'd be kind of pissed, but Gary Oldman never even mentions it to the
vice-president (Glenn Close).
The ending of film, featuring a mid-air transfer from a crippled Air
Force One to another plane, is exciting but inadequately justified. 
Hey, they are flying over water!  Even if the plane is supposed
"unlandable," surely it must be safer to ditch at sea then do a trapeze
act at 10,000 feet.  I mean, Air Force One does have floatation devices,
doesn't it?
Glenn Close is first rate as the vice-president, but otherwise the
performances are professional but unspectacular.  Ford plays his stock
"Vulnerable Everyman" character.  Even though this is not a Tom Clancy
film, one can't help but notice the similarities between the President
in this film and Clancy's Jack Ryan. Some other top-flight actors (Dean
Stockwell and William H. Macy) are sadly underutilized.
All in all, "Air Force One" is a professionally made big-budget
actioner, but the script could have done with a few extra trips through
typewriter.

Author
Chuck Dowling
Air Force One (1997) **1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Harrison Ford, Gary Oldman,
Wendy Crewson, Glenn Close, Dean Stockwell, William H. Macy, Xander
Berkeley, Jurgen Prochnow. Written by: Andrew W. Marlowe. Directed by:
Wolfgang Petersen. Running Time: 118 minutes.
Have you seen a film from 1988 called "Die Hard"? If you did, then you've
seen "Air Force One". Surely first time screenwriter Andrew W. Marlowe saw
it, as this movie seems to follow that film's formula to the letter, sadly
without adding anything really new to the concept.
In "Air Force One", career good guy Harrison Ford is President James
Marshall. After giving a passionate speech in Russia about how terrorism
will no longer be tolerated (a speech which oddly causes his staff to
cringe, as they actually believe it can be used AGAINST him in the next
election), he boards Air Force One and heads for home. Unfortunately, a
small group of Russian terrorists "disguised" as journalists (led by career
bad guy Gary Oldman) hijacks the plane and threatens to kill a hostage every
half hour unless a communist General (a cameo by Jurgen Prochnow of
Petersen's "Das Boot") is released from captivity.
I've yet to understand Hollywood's fascination with the President of the
United States as a main movie character. Furthermore, I've yet to understand
the paradox in which Hollywood presents such a character to us. In films
where the audience is required to love the character of the president, the
filmmakers go above and beyond to make him someone who we will all like. For
example, look at movies like "The American President", "Independence Day",
and now "Air Force One", in which the president is played by an actor almost
beloved by all, Harrison Ford. His character of the president makes
passionate speeches which actually say something, he clearly loves his
family, likes to relax by watching football, he's a decorated Vietnam
veteran, and most importantly, he fights and kills numerous terrorists when
they take over his airplane. What I don't understand is why movie presidents
have such strong character, yet whenever there's an election all we hear is
how character doesn't matter, many times coming from those in Hollywood. Now
this observation is not intended as any sort of political opinion (as I have
no interest in politics or in any political party), just as a curious
observation into why things are.
Ford again is in fine form, but do you think he's got this role down pat
yet? Also, I don't believe I've ever seen the man cry on film before, as he
does here. It's a very convincing performance sadly lost in a bunch of
cliches. William H. Macy is absolutely wasted in his role as one of the
staff members aboard Air Force One. This is the kind of role I'd see him in
years ago and think, "Wow, he's interesting. I can't wait to see him in
larger roles." Come on Hollywood, stop wasting this man.
Numerous logic problems plague the script. For example, in order for the
terrorists plans to work, they are dependent on one of the president's own
staff to initiate the takeover. This person's connection with the terrorists
is never revealed, why is he helping them? Also, to pull this off, you'd
think these terrorists need to be pretty sharp. Yet when the attack is about
to begin, moments after takeoff, Oldman has to wake them up! They were
napping! Later, when the pilots are killed (never seen that before), the
terrorists seem completely unprepared for that possibility. Even though
Oldman himself is blowing the pilots away, he's then shocked that they're
dead and has no idea what to do next.
A note to filmmakers using computers for special effects: Please, until you
can make a computer effect not look like a computer effect, stick with using
models. The computer created effect showing the final fate of Air Force One
is bad, bad, 1000 times bad. Look at movies from ten to fifteen years ago
which used models. They STILL look better than most of today's computer
generated effects.
"Air Force One" certainly isn't awful like most recent airplane disaster
flicks ("Con Air", "Turbulence"), but I certainly expected something better
considering the cast and director. As an action film using a hopelessly
overused theme, "Air Force One" is simply a standard entry into the genre
and doesn't improve on the "Die Hard" formula as it should have. [R]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.
